en: Auto focusing modes: AI; Area; Center weighted; Continuous; Contrast detection; Far/Near; Flexible spot; Monitoring; Multi point; One shot; Selective; Servo; Single; Spot; Tracking; Other
pl: Tryby automatycznego ustawiania ostrości: AI; Obszar; Centralnie ważone; Ciągłe; Wykrywanie kontrastu; Daleko/Blisko; Punkt elastyczny; Monitorowanie; Wielopunktowy; Jedno zdjęcie; Selektywny; Servo; Singiel; Punktowy; Śledzenie; Inne
ja: オートフォーカスモード: AI; エリア; 中央重み付け; 連続; コントラスト検出; 遠近; フレキシブルスポット; モニタリング; マルチポイント; ワンショット; セレクティブ; サーボ; シングル; スポット; トラッキング; その他
nl: Autofocusmodi: AI; Gebied; Verzwaard midden; Continu; Contrastdetectie; Ver/Nabij; Flexibele plek; Toezicht houden; Meerdere punten; Een schot; Selectief; Servo; Single; Spot; Volgen; Andere
da: Autofokustilstande: AI; Område; Centervægtet; Sammenhængende; Kontrastregistrering; Langt/nært; Fleksibel plads; Overvågning; Flere punkter; Et skud; Selektiv; Servo; Enkelt; Spot; Sporing; Andet
lt-LT: Automatinio fokusavimo režimai: AI; Ploto; Svertinio centro; Nuolatinis; Kontrasto aptikimas; Toli / arti; Lankstaus taško; Stebėjimas; Kelių taškų; Vieno kadro; Pasirenkamasis; „Servo“; Single; Taško; Sekimo; Kita
fi: Automaattitarkennustilat: AI; Alue; Keskipainotettu; Jatkuva; Kontrastin tunnistus; Kauko/lähi; Joustava piste; Valvonta; Monipisteinen; Yksi laukaus; Valikoiva; Servo; Yksittäinen; Piste; Seuranta; Muu
cs: Režimy automatického ostření: AI; Plocha; Vyvážený střed; Průběžné; Detekce kontrastu; Daleko/blízko; Flexibilní bod; Monitorování; Vícebodový; Jeden snímek; Selektivní; Servo; Jedna funkce; Bod; Sledování; Jiné
sv: Autofokuslägen: AI; Område; Centerviktad; Kontinuerlig; Kontrastavkänning; Långt/Nära; Flexibel punkt; Övervakning; Flera punkter; Ett försök; Selektiv; Servo; Enkel; Fläck; Spårning; Övrigt
it: Modalità di messa a fuoco automatica: AI; Area; Ponderato centrale; Continuo; Rilevazione del contrasto; Lontano/Vicino; Posto flessibile; Monitoraggio; Multipunto; One shot; Selettivo; Servo; Singolo; Spot; Monitoraggio; Altro
ro-RO: Moduri focalizare automată: AI; Zonă; Ponderată în centru; Continuă; Detectarea contrastului; Departe/Aproape; Punct flexibil; Monitorizare; Puncte multiple; One shot; Selectivă; Servo; Simplu; Spot; Tracking; Altele
ru: Режимы автофокусировки: ИИ; Область; Центровзвешенная; Непрерывная; Контрастное детектирование; Дальше/ближе; Гибкая точечная; Мониторинг; Многоточечная; Покадровая; Выборочная; Следящая; Покадровая; Точечная; С отслеживанием; Другая
sl-SI: Načini samodejnega ostrenja: UI; Območje; Sredinsko uteženo; Neprekinjeno; Zaznavanje kontrasta; Daleč/Blizu; Prilagodljiva točka; Spremljanje; Več točk; One shot; Selektivno; Servo; Enojni; Točka; Sledenje; Drugo
de: Autofokus-Modi: AI; Fläche; Mittenbetont; Gleichbleibend; Kontrasterkennung; Fern/Nah; Flexibler Ort; Überwachung; Mehrpunkt; One Shot; Selektiv; Servomotor; Einzel; Spot; Tracking; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Modos de foco automático: AI; Área; Centralizado; Contínuo; Detecção de contraste; Longe/Perto; Ponto flexível; Monitoramento; Multiponto; One shot; Seletivo; Servo; Único; Spot; Tracking; Outro
vi: Chế độ lấy nét tự động: AI; Khu vực; Trung tâm; Liên tục; Phát hiện độ tương phản; Xa/gần; Điểm linh hoạt; Thiết bị theo dõi; Đa điểm; Một phát; Chọn lọc; Servo; Đơn; Điểm; Theo dõi; Khác
hu: Automatikus fókuszálási módok: AI; Terület; Középre súlyozott; Folyamatos; Kontrasztfelismerés; Távol/közel; Flexibilis pont; Felügyelet; Több pont; Egy felvétel; Szelektív; Szervo; Egyetlen; Pont; Nyomon követés; Egyéb
el: Λειτουργίες αυτόματης εστίασης: AI; Περιοχής; Κεντροβαρής; Διαρκής; Ανίχνευσης αντίθεσης; Μακριά/Κοντά; Ευέλικτου σημείου; Παρακολούθησης θέματος; Πολλαπλών σημείων; Μίας λήψης; Επιλεκτική; Servo; Μονό; Σημειακή; Παρακολούθησης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Načini automatskog izoštravanja: UI; Područje; Ponderirana sredina; Kontinuirano; Otkrivanje kontrasta; Daleko/blizu; Fleksibilna točka; Nadzor; Više točaka; Jedan kadar; Selektivno; Servo; Jednostruko; Točka; Praćenje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Режими на автоматично фокусиране: AI; Област; Централно претеглен; Непрекъснат; Откриване на контраст; Далечно/близко; Гъвкаво място; Мониторинг; Многоточков; Един кадър; Селективен; Servo; Единичен; Спот; Проследяване; Други
zh-CN: 自动对焦模式: AI; 区域; 中央加权; 连续; 对比度检测; 远/近; 弹性单点; 监控; 多点; 单次自动; 选择性; 伺服; 单; 重点; 跟踪; 其他
tr: Otomatik Odaklama Modları: AI; Alan; Merkez ağırlıklı; Sürekli; Kontrast algılama; Uzak/Yakın; Esnek nokta; İzleme; Çok noktalı; Tek çekim; Seçici; Servo; Tek; Nokta; Takip; Diğer
th: โหมดโฟกัสอัตโนมัติ: AI; พื้นที่; เฉลี่ยหนักกลาง; ต่อเนื่อง; การตรวจจับคอนทราสต์; ใกล้/ไกล; เลือกจุดโฟกัสด้วยตัวเอง; ระบบเฝ้าติดตาม; หลายจุด; ช็อตเดียว; หน้าชัดหลังเบลอ; เซอร์โว; แบบเดี่ยว; เฉพาะจุด; ติดตามวัตถุ; อื่นๆ
nb: Autofokusmoduser: AI; Område; Sentrumsprioritert; Kontinuerlig; Kontrastgjenkjenning; Langt/nært; Fleksibel; Overvåkning; Flerpunkt; Ett skudd; Selektiv; Servo; Enkel; Spot; Sporing; Annet
fr: Modes de focus automatiques: AI; Zone; Pondéré au centre; continu; Détection de contraste; Loin/Proche; Point flexible; Moniteurs; Multipoint; Un tir; Sélectif; Servo; Unique; Place; Suivi; Autre
zh-TW: 自動對焦模式: AI; 區域; 中央加權; 不間斷的; 自動對焦; 遠/近; 彈性單點; 監控; 多點; 一次性的; 可選擇的; Servo; 單倍; 點; 追蹤; 其他
sk-SK: Režimy automatického zaostrovania: UI; Oblasť; Stredovo vážený; Nepretržitý; Detekcia kontrastu; Ďaleko/blízko; Flexibilné miesto; Monitorovanie; Viacbodový; Jeden pokus; Selektívny; Servo; Jeden; Miesto; Sledovanie; Iné
es: Modos de enfoque automático: AI; Área; Ponderado al centro; Continuo; Detección de contraste; Lejos/Cerca; Punto flexible; Monitoreo; Multipunto; Disparo único; Selectivo; Servo; Individual; Punto; Seguimiento; Otros
pt-PT: Modos de foco automático: AI; Área; Centro de gravidade; Contínuo; Deteção de contraste; Longe/Perto; Ponto flexível; Monitorização; Multiponto; Tentativa única; Seletivo; Servo; Único; Ponto; Rastreio; Outro
ko: 자동 초점 모드: AI; 영역; 중앙 중점; 연속; 대비 검출; 원거리/근거리; 플렉시블 스팟; 모니터링; 다중 초점; 원 샷; 선택적; 서보; 싱글; 점; 추적; 기타